incubator/apertium-as-hi/apertium-as-hi.hi.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->

<!--
	developed by Anusuya Phukan
	(Source Forge account: anu1328)
	St. Anthony's College, Shillong, 
	India
-->

<dictionary>
	<alphabet>अआइईउऊएऐओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनपफबभमयरलवशषसहक्षज्ञऋ</alphabet>

	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n"/> 			<!-- noun -->
			<sdef n="sg"/>		<!-- singular -->
			<sdef n="pl"/>		<!-- plural -->
			<sdef n="m"/>		<!-- male -->
			<sdef n="f"/>		<!-- female -->
			<sdef n="subj"/>		<!-- subject -->
			<sdef n="obj"/>		<!-- object -->
			<sdef n="where"/>	<!-- where -->
			<sdef n="pos"/>	<!-- possessive -->

		<sdef n="np"/> 			<!-- proper nouns -->
		<sdef n="enc"/> 			<!-- enclitics -->
    		<sdef n="vblex"/> 			<!-- verb --> 
    		<sdef n="vbser"/> 			<!-- verb --> 
			<sdef n="pres"/>		<!-- present -->
			<sdef n="prescont"/>	<!-- present continuous -->
			<sdef n="past"/>		<!-- past -->
			<sdef n="pastcont"/>		<!-- past continuous -->
			<sdef n="pastperf"/>		<!-- past perfect -->
			<sdef n="ft"/>		<!-- future -->
			<sdef n="low"/>		<!-- lowest courtesy -->
			<sdef n="mid"/>		<!-- medium courtesy -->
			<sdef n="hi"/>		<!-- highest courtesy -->
			<sdef n="prn"/>		<!-- pronoun -->
			<sdef n="p1"/>		<!-- first person -->
			<sdef n="p2"/>		<!-- second person -->
			<sdef n="p3"/>		<!-- third person -->
    		<sdef n="adj"/> 			<!-- adjectives --> 
		<sdef n="ot"/>			<!-- others -->
		<sdef n="num"/> 			<!-- numerals -->
		<sdef n="sep"/> 			<!-- punctuation -->
		<sdef n="sent"/> 			<!-- sentence ending punctuation -->
  	</sdefs>

	<pardefs>

		<!-- Punctuation -->
		<pardef n="sep">
      			<e>
        			<p>
	          		<l/>
          				<r><s n="sep"/></r>
        			</p>
	      		</e>
    		</pardef>

		<pardef n="sent">
      			<e>
        			<p>
	          		<l/>
          				<r><s n="sent"/></r>
        			</p>
	      		</e>
    		</pardef>

		<!-- Numerals -->
	    	<pardef n="num">
      			<e>
	        		<p>
	          		<l/>
          			<r><s n="num"/></r>
        			</p>
	      		</e>
	    	</pardef>

		<pardef n="वह_enc">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="enc"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="enc"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>

		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अपराध_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओं<b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अभिमान_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="इतिहास_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>का</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="where"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>को</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="आँख_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>से</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>से</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओं<b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अंगोछा_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओं<b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अस्पताल_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओं<b/>में</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अकासी_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>याँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="कलम_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>से</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="किसान_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>ने</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>का</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>को</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अध्यापक_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>ने</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>को</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>का</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अप्सरा_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>ने</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओं<b/>ने</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>की</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="names_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>ने</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>को</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="months_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>में</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="places_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>में</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>का</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अलौकिक_adj">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="अगर_ot">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="ot"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="तुम_prn">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm="वह"><i>वह</i><par n="वह_enc"/></e>
		<e lm="१"><i>१</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="२"><i>२</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="३"><i>३</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="४"><i>४</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="५"><i>५</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="६"><i>६</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="७"><i>७</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="८"><i>८</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="."><i>.</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm="\"><i>\</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm="?"><i>?</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm=";"><i>;</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm=":"><i>:</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm="!"><i>!</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm="।"><i>।</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm="अंजना"><i>अंजना</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अनुसूया"><i>अनुसूया</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अनामिका"><i>अनामिका</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अर्जुन"><i>अर्जुन</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="श्रीकृष्ण"><i>श्रीकृष्ण</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="इंद्र"><i>इंद्र</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="राम"><i>राम</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अगस्त"><i>अगस्त</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अगहन"><i>अगहन</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="जून"><i>जून</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="फरवरी"><i>फरवरी</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="मई'"><i>मई'</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="सप्तम्बर"><i>सप्तम्बर</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="डिसम्बर"><i>डिसम्बर</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ब्रह्मपुत्र"><i>ब्रह्मपुत्र</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अमरीका"><i>अमरीका</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ब्रह्मपुत्र"><i>ब्रह्मपुत्र</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="असम"><i>असम</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="भारत"><i>भारत</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कश्मीर"><i>कश्मीर</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="हिन्दुस्तान"><i>हिन्दुस्तान</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="आँख"><i>आँख</i><par n="आँख_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अंगूर"><i>अंगूर</i><par n="अपराध_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अंगोछा"><i>अंगोछा</i><par n="अंगोछा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="आलू"><i>आलू</i><par n="अपराध_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अध्यापक"><i>अध्यापक</i><par n="अध्यापक_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अप्सरा"><i>अप्सरा</i><par n="अप्सरा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अमरूद"><i>अमरूद</i><par n="अपराध_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अलवान"><i>अलवान</i><par n="अंगोछा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अवधान"><i>अवधान</i><par n="अभिमान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अवसर"><i>अवसर</i><par n="अपराध_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अस्पताल"><i>अस्पताल</i><par n="अंगोछा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अदालत"><i>अदालत</i><par n="अंगोछा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अपराधी"><i>अपराधी</i><par n="अध्यापक_n"/></e>
		<e lm="आईना"><i>आईना</i><par n="अंगोछा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="आकाश"><i>आकाश</i><par n="अंगोछा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="आदत"><i>आदत</i><par n="अपराध_n"/></e>
		<e lm="इकरार"><i>इकरार</i><par n="अभिमान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="इमारत"><i>इमारत</i><par n="अपराध_n"/></e>
		<e lm="औरत"><i>औरत</i><par n="अप्सरा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="औरत"><i>औरत</i><par n="अप्सरा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कदम"><i>कदम</i><par n="अभिमान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कबूतर"><i>कबूतर</i><par n="अकासी_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कब्रिस्तान"><i>कब्रिस्तान</i><par n="इतिहास_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कार्यालय"><i>कार्यालय</i><par n="अस्पताल_n"/></e>
		<e lm="किसान"><i>किसान</i><par n="किसान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="किसान"><i>किसान</i><par n="किसान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कुत्ता"><i>कुत्ता</i><par n="अपराध_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कुल्हाड़ी"><i>कुल्हाड़ी</i><par n="कलम_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कैंची"><i>कैंची</i><par n="कलम_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कोठरी"><i>कोठरी</i><par n="इतिहास_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कोयल"><i>कोयल</i><par n="अकासी_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कौआ"><i>कौआ</i><par n="अकासी_n"/></e>
		<e lm="कहानी"><i>कहानी</i><par n="अभिमान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="गीदड़"><i>गीदड़</i><par n="अभिमान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="घास"><i>घास</i><par n="इतिहास_n"/></e>
		<e lm="चाची"><i>चाची</i><par n="अप्सरा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="चिड़िया"><i>चिड़िया</i><par n="अकासी_n"/></e>
		<e lm="छुट्टी"><i>छुट्टी</i><par n="अभिमान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="जवानी"><i>जवानी</i><par n="इतिहास_n"/></e>
		<e lm="तोता"><i>तोता</i><par n="अकासी_n"/></e>
		<e lm="दादा"><i>दादा</i><par n="अध्यापक_n"/></e>
		<e lm="दुकान"><i>दुकान</i><par n="अस्पताल_n"/></e>
		<e lm="दुल्हन"><i>दुल्हन</i><par n="अकासी_n"/></e>
		<e lm="धूल"><i>धूल</i><par n="इतिहास_n"/></e>
		<e lm="प्राणी"><i>प्राणी</i><par n="अभिमान_n"/></e>
		<e lm="परीक्षक"><i>परीक्षक</i><par n="अध्यापक_n"/></e>
		<e lm="बेटा"><i>बेटा</i><par n="अध्यापक_n"/></e>
		<e lm="भय"><i>भय</i><par n="इतिहास_n"/></e>
		<e lm="महाराज"><i>महाराज</i><par n="अध्यापक_n"/></e>
		<e lm="मासी"><i>मासी</i><par n="अप्सरा_n"/></e>
		<e lm="मेहमान"><i>मेहमान</i><par n="अध्यापक_n"/></e>
		<e lm="लड़की"><i>लड़की</i><par n="अकासी_n"/></e>
		<e lm="विद्यालय"><i>विद्यालय</i><par n="अस्पताल_n"/></e>
		<e lm="हाथी"><i>हाथी</i><par n="इतिहास_n"/></e>
		<e lm="अट्ठासी"><i>अट्ठासी</i><par n="अलौकिक_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="आजीवन"><i>आजीवन</i><par n="अलौकिक_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="उपस्थित"><i>उपस्थित</i><par n="अलौकिक_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="कुशल"><i>कुशल</i><par n="अलौकिक_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ठंडा"><i>ठंडा</i><par n="अलौकिक_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="बड़ा"><i>बड़ा</i><par n="अलौकिक_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="हरा"><i>हरा</i><par n="अलौकिक_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ओर"><i>ओर</i><par n="अगर_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="कारण"><i>कारण</i><par n="अगर_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="किधर"><i>किधर</i><par n="अगर_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="कैसे"><i>कैसे</i><par n="अगर_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="जय"><i>जय</i><par n="अगर_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="यहाँ"><i>यहाँ</i><par n="अगर_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="वैसे"><i>वैसे</i><par n="अगर_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="तुम्हें"><i>तुम्हें</i><par n="तुम_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="तू"><i>तू</i><par n="तुम_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="मै"><i>मै</i><par n="तुम_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="मेरा"><i>मेरा</i><par n="तुम_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="यह भी"><i>यह<b/>भी</i><par n="तुम_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="वह"><i>वह</i><par n="तुम_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="हमारा"><i>हमारा</i><par n="तुम_prn"/></e>
